SpellChecking/SpellCheckingTests/bin/Debug/Dictionaries/chuvash.aff
SFX H Y 283
SFX H 0 атăп/RS [^уа]
SFX H у ăватăп/RS у
SFX H 0 тăп/RS а
SFX H 0 мастăп/RS .
SFX H 0 атăн/RS [^уа]
SFX H у ăватăн/RS у
SFX H 0 тăн/RS а
SFX H 0 мастăн/RS .
SFX H 0 ать [^уай]
SFX H у ăвать у
SFX H 0 ть а
SFX H й ять й
SFX H 0 масть .
SFX H 0 атпăр/RS [^уа]
SFX H у ăватпăр/RS у
SFX H 0 тпăр/RS а
SFX H 0 мастпăр/RS .
SFX H 0 атăр/RS [^уа]
SFX H у ăватăр/RS у
SFX H 0 тăр/RS а
SFX H 0 мастăр/RS .
SFX H 0 аççĕ/T [^уа]
SFX H у ăваççĕ/T у
SFX H 0 ççĕ/T а
SFX H 0 маççĕ/T .
SFX H 0 аятăп/RS [^уай]
SFX H й яятăп/RS й
SFX H у ăваятăп у
SFX H 0 ятăп/RS а
SFX H 0 аймастăп/RS [^ауй]
SFX H у ăваймастăп/RS у
SFX H 0 ймастăп/RS а
SFX H й яймастăп/RS й
SFX H 0 аятăн/RS [^уай]
SFX H у ăваятăн/RS у
SFX H й яятăн/RS й
SFX H 0 ятăн/RS а
SFX H 0 аймастăн/RS [^ауй]
SFX H у ăваймастăн/RS у
SFX H 0 ймастăн/RS а
SFX H й яймастăп/RS а
SFX H 0 аять [^уай]
SFX H у ăваять у
SFX H й яять й
SFX H 0 ять а
SFX H 0 аймасть [^ауй]
SFX H у ăваймасть у
SFX H 0 ймасть а
SFX H й яймасть й
SFX H 0 аятпăр/RS [^уай]
SFX H у ăваятпăр/RS у
SFX H 0 ятпăр/RS а
SFX H й яятпăр/RS й
SFX H 0 аймастпăр/RS [^ауй]
SFX H у ăваймастпăр/RS у
SFX H 0 ймастпăр/RS а
SFX H й яймастпăр/RS й
SFX H 0 аятăр/RS [^уай]
SFX H у ăваятăр/RS у
SFX H 0 ятăр/RS а
SFX H й яятăр/RS й
SFX H 0 аймастăр/RS [^ауй]
SFX H у ăваймастăр/RS у
SFX H 0 ймастăр/RS а
SFX H й яймастăр/RS й
SFX H 0 аяççĕ/T [^уай]
SFX H у ăваяççĕ/T у
SFX H 0 яççĕ/T а
SFX H й яяççĕ/T й
SFX H 0 аймаççĕ/T [^ауй]
SFX H у ăваймаççĕ/T у
SFX H 0 ймаççĕ/T а
SFX H й яймаççĕ/T й
SFX H 0 ăп/RS [^ау]
SFX H а ăп/RS а
SFX H у ăвăп/RS у
SFX H 0 мăп/RS .
SFX H 0 ăн/RS [^ау]
SFX H а ăн/RS а
SFX H у ăвăн/RS у
SFX H 0 мăн/RS .
SFX H 0 аймăн/RS [^ауй]
SFX H 0 ймăн/RS а
SFX H й ямăн/RS й
SFX H у ăваймăн/RS у
SFX H 0 ĕ/R [^ау]
SFX H а ĕ/R а
SFX H у ăвĕ/R у
SFX H 0 мĕ/R .
SFX H 0 ăпăр/RS [^ау]
SFX H а ăпăр/RS а
SFX H у ăвăпăр/RS у
SFX H 0 мăпăр/RS .
SFX H 0 ăр/RS [^ау]
SFX H а ăр/RS а
SFX H у ăвăр/RS у
SFX H 0 мăр/RS .
SFX H 0 ĕç/T [^ау]
SFX H а ĕç/T а
SFX H у ăвĕç/T у
SFX H 0 мĕç/T .
SFX H 0 рăм/RS [^лрн]
SFX H 0 тăм/RS [лрн]
SFX H 0 марăм/RS .
SFX H 0 рăн/RS [^лрн]
SFX H 0 тăн/RS [лрн]
SFX H 0 марăн/RS .
SFX H 0 рĕ/RT [^лрн]
SFX H 0 чĕ/T [лрн]
SFX H 0 марĕ/RT .
SFX H 0 рăмăр/RS [^лрн]
SFX H 0 тăмăр/RS [лрн]
SFX H 0 марăмăр/RS .
SFX H 0 рăр/RS [^лрн]
SFX H 0 тăр/RS [лрн]
SFX H 0 марăр/RS .
SFX H 0 рĕç/T [^лрн]
SFX H 0 чĕç/T [лрн]
SFX H 0 марĕç/T .
SFX H 0 аттăм/RS [^айу]
SFX H 0 ттăм/RS а
SFX H у ăваттăм/RS у
SFX H й яттăм/RS й
SFX H 0 мастăм/RS .
SFX H 0 аттăн/RS [^айу]
SFX H 0 ттăн/RS а
SFX H у ăваттăн/RS у
SFX H й яттăн/RS й
SFX H 0 мастăн/RS .
SFX H 0 атчĕ/T [^айу]
SFX H 0 тчĕ/T а
SFX H у ăватчĕ/T у
SFX H й ятчĕ/T й
SFX H 0 мастчĕ/T .
SFX H 0 аттăмăр/RS [^айу]
SFX H 0 ттăмăр/RS а
SFX H у ăваттăмăр/RS у
SFX H й яттăмăр/RS й
SFX H 0 мастăмăр/RS .
SFX H 0 аттăр/RS [^айу]
SFX H 0 ттăр/RS а
SFX H у ăваттăр/RS у
SFX H й яттăр/RS й
SFX H 0 мастăр/RS .
SFX H 0 атчĕç/T [^айу]
SFX H 0 тчĕç/T а
SFX H у ăватчĕç/T у
SFX H й ятчĕ/T й
SFX H 0 мастчĕç/T .
SFX H 0 саттăм/RS .
SFX H 0 саттăн/R .
SFX H 0 саччĕ .
SFX H 0 саттăмăр/R .
SFX H 0 саттăр/R .
SFX H 0 саччĕç/T .
SFX H 0 ăттăм/RS [^уа]
SFX H у ăвăттăм/RS у
SFX H а ăттăм/RS а
SFX H 0 мăттăм/RS .
SFX H 0 ăттăн/RS [^уа]
SFX H у ăвăттăн/RS у
SFX H а ăттăн/RS а
SFX H 0 мăттăн/RS .
SFX H 0 ĕччĕ/T [^уа]
SFX H у ăвĕччĕ/T у
SFX H а ĕччĕ/T а
SFX H 0 мĕччĕ/T .
SFX H 0 ăттăмăр/RS [^уа]
SFX H у ăвăттăмăр/RS у
SFX H а ăттăмăр/RS а
SFX H 0 мăттăмăр/RS .
SFX H 0 ăттăр/RS [^уа]
SFX H у ăвăттăр/RS у
SFX H а ăттăр/RS а
SFX H 0 мăттăр/RS .
SFX H 0 ĕччĕç/T [^уа]
SFX H у ăвĕччĕç/T у
SFX H а ĕччĕç/T а
SFX H 0 мĕччĕç/T .
SFX H 0 ăпин [^уа]
SFX H у ăвăпин у
SFX H а ăпин а
SFX H 0 мăпин .
SFX H 0 ăсăн [^уа]
SFX H у ăвăсăн у
SFX H а ăсăн а
SFX H 0 мăсăн .
SFX H 0 ин/R [^уа]
SFX H у ăвин/R у
SFX H а ин/R а
SFX H 0 мин .
SFX H 0 ăпăрин [^уа]
SFX H у ăвăпăрин у
SFX H а ăпăрин а
SFX H 0 мăпăрин .
SFX H 0 ăсăр [^уа]
SFX H у ăвăсăр у
SFX H а ăсăр а
SFX H 0 мăсăр .
SFX H 0 ĕçин [^уа]
SFX H у ăвĕçин у
SFX H а ĕçин а
SFX H 0 мĕçин .
SFX H 0 ам/RS [^уая]
SFX H у ăвам/RS у
SFX H 0 м/RS а
SFX H й ям/RS й
SFX H 0 тăр/RS .
SFX H 0 ар [^уа]
SFX H у ăвар у
SFX H 0 р а
SFX H й яр й
SFX H 0 ăр/S [^уа]
SFX H у ăвăр/S у
SFX H а ăр/S а
SFX H 0 ччăр/S .
SFX H 0 ма/S .
SFX H 0 масăр/S .
SFX H 0 машкăн/S .
SFX H 0 малли/AT .
SFX H 0 маллисем/P .
SFX H 0 акан/AS [^ауй]
SFX H 0 акансем/P [^ауй]
SFX H 0 кан/AS а
SFX H 0 кансем/P а
SFX H у ăвакан/AS у
SFX H у ăвакансем/P у
SFX H й якан/AS й
SFX H й якансем/P й
SFX H 0 ни/BRT .
SFX H 0 нисем/P .
SFX H 0 ман/RS .
SFX H 0 маншăн/S .
SFX H 0 айман/RS [^ауй]
SFX H 0 йман/RS а
SFX H й яйман/RS й
SFX H у ăвайман/RS у
SFX H 0 айманшăн/S [^ауй]
SFX H 0 йманшăн/S а
SFX H й яйманшăн/S й
SFX H у ăвайманшăн/S у
SFX H 0 манни/BTR .
SFX H 0 маннисем/P .
SFX H 0 асси/BRT [^ауй]
SFX H 0 ассисем/P [^ауй]
SFX H 0 сси/BRT а
SFX H 0 ссисем/P а
SFX H у ăвасси/BRT у
SFX H у ăвассисем/P у
SFX H й ясси/BRT й
SFX H й яссисем/P й
SFX H 0 ас/TR [^ауй]
SFX H 0 с/RS а
SFX H у ăвас/RS у
SFX H 0 асла [^ауй]
SFX H 0 сла а
SFX H у ăвасла у
SFX H 0 асшăн/RS [^ауй]
SFX H 0 сшăн/RS а
SFX H у ăвасшăн/RS у
SFX H й яс/RS й
SFX H 0 нă/RS .
SFX H 0 нăшăн/S .
SFX H 0 нăран/S .
SFX H 0 малла/RS .
SFX H 0 ан/RS [^ауй]
SFX H 0 н/RS а
SFX H у ăван/RS у
SFX H й ян/RS й
SFX H 0 са/RS .
SFX H 0 сан/S .
SFX H 0 масан/S .
SFX H 0 сассăн/S .
SFX H 0 масассăн/S .
SFX H 0 а [^ауй]
SFX H у ăва у
SFX H й я й
SFX H 0 иччен/T [^ау]
SFX H а иччен/T а
SFX H у ăвиччен/T у
SFX H 0 миччен/T .
SFX H 0 массерен/T .
SFX H 0 нăçемĕн/T .

SFX I Y 55
SFX I а и а
SFX I а ин а
SFX I а ине а
SFX I а инче а
SFX I а ипе а
SFX I а исĕр а
SFX I а исем/P а
SFX I а ишĕн а
SFX I 0 х а
SFX I а ăсем/P а
SFX I а ăн а
SFX I а ăна а
SFX I а ăра а
SFX I а ăран а
SFX I а ăпа а
SFX I а ăпалан а
SFX I а ăсăр а
SFX I а ăшăн а
SFX I а ăри а
SFX I о и о
SFX I о ин о
SFX I о ине о
SFX I о инче о
SFX I о ипе о
SFX I о исĕр о
SFX I о исем/P о
SFX I о ишĕн о
SFX I о ăсем/P о
SFX I о ăн о
SFX I о ăна о
SFX I о ăра о
SFX I о ăран о
SFX I о ăпа о
SFX I о ăпалан о
SFX I о ăсăр о
SFX I о ăшăн о
SFX I о ăри о
SFX I я и я 
SFX I я ин я
SFX I я ине я
SFX I я инче я
SFX I я ипе я
SFX I я исĕр я
SFX I я исем/P я
SFX I я ишĕн я
SFX I я ьăсем/P я
SFX I я ьăн я
SFX I я ьăна я
SFX I я ьăра я
SFX I я ьăран я
SFX I я ьăпа я
SFX I я ьăпалан я
SFX I я ьăсăр я
SFX I я ьăшăн я
SFX I я ьăри я

SFX J N 6
SFX J 0 ах [^а]
SFX J 0 х а
SFX J 0 рах .
SFX J 0 рахчĕ .
SFX J 0 тарах .
SFX J 0 тарахчĕ .

SFX K Y 14
SFX K 0 са .
SFX K 0 сах .
SFX K 0 сан .
SFX K 0 а [^ау]
SFX K у ăва у
SFX K 0 иччен [^ау]
SFX K а иччен а
SFX K у ăвиччен у
SFX K 0 массерен .
SFX K 0 нăçем .
SFX K 0 нăçемĕн .
SFX K у ăвуçăн у
SFX K 0 уçăн [^ау]
SFX K а уçăн а

SFX L Y 16
SFX L 0 се .
SFX L 0 сех .
SFX L 0 сен .
SFX L 0 е [^еӳ]
SFX L ӳ ĕве ӳ
SFX L 0 иччен [^еӳи]
SFX L е иччен е
SFX L и йиччен и
SFX L ӳ ăвиччен ӳ
SFX L 0 мессерен .
SFX L 0 нĕçем .
SFX L 0 нĕçемĕн .
SFX L ӳ ĕвӳçĕн е
SFX L 0 ӳçĕн [^еӳи]
SFX L е ӳçĕн е
SFX L и йӳçĕн и

SFX M N 33
SFX M е и е
SFX M е ине е
SFX M е исене е
SFX M е инче е
SFX M е исенче е
SFX M е ипе е
SFX M е исемпе е
SFX M е исĕр е
SFX M е исемсĕр е
SFX M е исем е
SFX M е ишĕн е
SFX M е исемшĕн е
SFX M 0 х е
SFX M е ĕсем е
SFX M е ĕсемех е
SFX M е ĕн е
SFX M е ĕсен е
SFX M е ĕне е
SFX M е ĕсене е
SFX M е ĕре е
SFX M е ĕсенче е
SFX M е ĕрен е
SFX M е ĕсенчен е
SFX M е ĕпе е
SFX M е ĕсемпе е
SFX M е ĕпелен е
SFX M е ĕсемпелен е
SFX M е ĕсĕр е
SFX M е ĕсемсĕр е
SFX M е ĕшĕн е
SFX M е ĕсемшĕн е
SFX M е ĕри е
SFX M е ĕсенчи е

SFX N Y 24
SFX N сть çăн сть
SFX N сь çăн ись
SFX N зь çăн зь
SFX N сть çсем/P сть
SFX N сь çсем/P ись
SFX N зь çсем/P зь
SFX N сть çа сть
SFX N сь çа ись
SFX N зь çа зь
SFX N сть çра сть
SFX N сь çра ись
SFX N зь çра зь
SFX N сть çран сть
SFX N сь çран ись
SFX N зь çран зь
SFX N сть çпа сть
SFX N сь çпа ись
SFX N зь çпа зь
SFX N сть çсăр сть
SFX N сь çсăр ись
SFX N зь çсăр зь
SFX N сть çшăн сть
SFX N сь çшăн ись
SFX N зь çшăн зь
