SpellChecking/SpellCheckingTests/bin/Debug/Dictionaries/chuvash.dic
çĕнтер/GL
çырт/H
ăнлан/H
ăнсăртран/J
ăссăн/J
ăсчахлан/H
ăшăлла/J
Аксинья/I
Алёха/I
Анисимовна/I
Аргентина/I
Атнюкова/I
Богдановна/I
Валериановна/I
Васильевна/I
Висла/I
Вятка/I
Геннадиевна/I
Гриша/I
Джакарта/I
Евсеевна/I
Захаровна/I
Инесса/I
Казимировна/I
Касабланка/I
Коломна/I
Кузьма/I
Литва/I
Люцина/I
Марковна/I
Мексика/I
Надя/I
Никифоровна/I
Орлова/I
Петрушкова/I
Раиса/I
Сарагоса/I
Серёга/I
Стёпка/I
Тимофеевна/I
Ухта/I
Фёдоровна/I
Шива/I
Этна/I
Яуза/I
абхазла/J
авăнчăклат/H
авиаэскадрилья/I
аврăнтар/H
авторла/HJ
автосборка/I
азбукăлла/HJ
айăккăн/J
айваннăн/J
айлăмлан/H
аккредитла/HJ
акробатика/I
албанла/J
алтăн/H
алхасуллăн/J
амальгамăла/HJ
аминокислота/I
анекдотла/HJ
аннексионистла/H
антитеза/I
антонимла/HJ
апатлантар/H
арабла/HJ
аркада/I
аркканла/H
асăрхануллăн/J
асаплăн/J
аскетла/H
астронавтика/I
атлетла/HJ
ахăрттар/H
ачашшăн/J
бадминтонла/J
байдарка/I
барщина/I
батракла/HJ
бензохранилище/M
бионика/I
боксла/HJ
бомба/I
бомбоубежище/M
бубна/I
буржуйла/J
былина/I
вăйсăррăн/J
вăльтăртат/H
вăраххăн/J
вăрла/H
вăтанчăклăн/J
вăштлат/H
валеç/L
варкăш/H
васкаваррăн/J
вашăккăн/J
вашкăр/H
ведомость/N
ведомство/I
визитка/I
винаватлăн/J
власть/N
водохранилище/M
волокита/I
вульгаризаторла/HJ
выçтахлан/H
выльăхла/J
газохранилище/M
галера/I
героиня/I
гимнастёрка/I
гравюра/I
гранитлан/H
гусеница/I
демократла/J
держава/I
догма/I
духовка/I
ерт/L
живопись/N
заготовка/I
заправка/I
зернохранилище/M
зообаза/I
идиотла/J
известь/N
императрица/I
инженерла/HJ
истерикăлла/J
иялат/H
йăлла/H
йăнлаттар/H
йăрăмăн/J
йăранла/H
йăшăкла/H
йышăнтар/H
кăвакарчăнла/J
кăкарăнтар/H
кăн/HA
кăпкалантар/H
кăркăсла/J
кăсăклантар/H
кăчăркалан/H
каçăрăлкалан/H
каватина/I
казакла/J
какайла/H
камсăртат/H
канăçсăррăн/J
канва/I
капанлаттар/H
каппăн/J
кардиограмма/I
каркаррăн/J
карклат/H
карчăклан/H
кассирша/I
катлат/H
катмаррăн/J
каштăрккалан/H
кварта/I
кзпмаррăн/J
кинолента/I
кинопромышленность/N
классика/I
кнопка/I
колея/N
колоннада/I
коммунистла/J
консульство/I
корица/I
косынка/I
крахмала/H
крепость/N
куккукла/HJ
кур/H
курдла/J
курьерша/I
куштанла/HJ
лăйма/H
лăпăлтат/H
лăскаттар/H
лакăртаттар/H
лапăрккала/H
лаптаклан/H
лапталла/J
латăртат/H
ленинла/J
летопись/N
ликвидаторла/H
лимонка/I
мăкăрт/H
мăнаççăн/J
мăтăкла/H
мăшăррăн/J
магараджа/I
мазутла/H
максималистла/HJ
масарла/HJ
маскировкăла/H
маскировка/I
медучилище/M
метафизика/I
меценатла/HJ
моноплан/H
морилка/I
мулкачла/J
нăйла/H
намăссăрлан/H
наркăмăшла/HJ
натура/I
нефтехранилище/M
ногайла/HJ
нравственность/N
нушалан/H
область/N
общественность/N
овощехранилище/M
октава/I
пăлхануллăн/J
пăнлат/H
пăсăл/H
пăчăлтат/H
пайăррăн/J
пайлаттар/H
панорама/I
пантăртаттар/H
патриотла/HJ
педучилище/M
перспектива/I
пластмасса/I
повесть/N
полякла/J
портьера/I
провокаторла/H
программа/I
промышленность/N
профтехучилище/M
пул/H
пусарăнтар/H
пушкăртла/J
пыллантар/H
пьеса/I
рационализмла/HJ
регата/I
ренегатла/HJ
романтика/I
сăвăлла/J
сăмсала/H
сăпайлăн/J
сăранлан/H
савăк/J
савăнтар/H
савăнчăклăн/J
салютла/J
санкăлтат/H
сарăпсăр/J
саркалантар/H
сварщица/I
сепаратизмла/HJ
силосохранилище/M
симулянтка/I
системăлан/H
словакла/J
смена/I
совесть/N
специальность/N
спецовка/I
стихийăлла/HJ
стихия/I
стрельбище/M
сул/H
сунтар/H
сутăн/H
сыворотка/I
сыпан/H
сыхлануллăн/J
тăварăн/H
тăкăсла/HJ
тăкаклаттар/H
тăнăçсăрлан/H
тăплан/H
тăрмалан/H
тăруккăн/J
таджикла/J
таклат/H
тар/HAK
тарăнлат/H
татăклăн/J
телеателье/M
терракота/I
тигрла/J
тинкер/L
труппа/I
туйăмсăрлан/H
турамлан/H
турккăлла/J
тутăх/HAK
тымарлан/H
уçăмлăн/HJ
укçалла/HJ
улмаш/H
ултавлăн/J
упăрч/J
усалла/J
утюглаттар/H
фаланга/I
фальцла/HJ
феодализмла/HJ
ферзь/N
фисташка/I
флегматикла/HJ
фреска/I
хăвалаттар/H
хăватлăн/J
хăнкăртаттар/H
хăрахшарăн/J
хăчлат/H
хавхалануллăн/J
халтăрка/H
хапкăн/AJ
хатăррăн/J
хранилище/M
хуçасăрлат/H
хуралла/J
хусăклан/H
хыпкăчла/HJ
цилиндрла/HJ
цифра/I
чăмăррăн/J
чăрмавла/H
чалăшлан/H
чарусăрла/HJ
чашлаттар/H
чылаййăн/J
шăйлат/H
шăраçлан/H
шăртлăн/J
шалпарлан/H
шанăçлăн/J
шахматла/HJ
шинăла/H
шомполка/I
штамповкăла/HJ
шухăшлăн/J
шыçăн/H
ылхануллăн/J
ытлăн/J
экипировкăла/H
экстремистла/HJ
электрокардиограмма/I
юлташла/HJ
юсавлăн/J
юсан/H
янла/H
яранга/I
яри/J
